North Dakota, session 69, SB2371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-10-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-10-16. One-way roadways and rotary traffic islands.
1. The director and local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions
may designate any highway, roadway, part of a roadway, or specific lanes upon which
vehicular traffic shall proceed in one direction at all or such times as shall be indicated by
official traffic-control devices.
2. Upon a roadway so designated for one-way traffic, a vehicle shall be driven only in the
direction designated at all or at such times as shall be indicated by official traffic-control
devices.
3. A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island must be driven only to the right of such island.
4. After a vehicle enters a rotary traffic island, the vehicle may not exit from any position within
the rotary traffic island without first giving a signal of intention to exit the rotary traffic island.

S. B. NO. 2371 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2371.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State